Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.345, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Health professional's medical statement. (a) The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end develop a format for the medical statement. The medical statement must be signed by a health professional who certifies that the applicant isnew text begin (1)new text end a physically disabled person as defined in subdivision 2new text begin , or (2) eligible for a certificate under subdivision 6new text end . The commissioner may request additional information from the health professional if needed to verify the applicant's eligibility. The medical statement deleted text begin that the applicant is a physically disabled persondeleted text end must specify whether the disability is permanent or temporary and, if temporary, the opinion of the health professional as to the duration of the disability. new text begin (b)new text end A health professional who fraudulently certifies to the commissioner that a person is deleted text begin a physically disabled person as defined in subdivision 2, and that the person is entitled todeleted text end new text begin eligible fornew text end the disability plates authorized by section 168.021 or deleted text begin to thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end certificate authorized by this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to a fine of $500. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The commissioner may waive the requirement of providing a statement of a health professional if the applicant has previously filed with the commissioner a statement of a health professional certifying that the applicant has a permanent physical disability. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.345, subdivision 3b, is amended to read: Subd. 3b. Certificate design, format, information. new text begin (a) new text end A certificate must be made of plastic or similar durable material and must bear its expiration date prominently on both sides. A certificate issued deleted text begin to a temporarily disabled persondeleted text end new text begin on a temporary basisnew text end must display the date of expiration deleted text begin of the duration of the disability,deleted text end as determined under subdivision 3 deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end 3anew text begin , or 6new text end . new text begin (b)new text end Each applicant must be provided a summary of the parking privileges and restrictions that apply to each motor vehicle for which the certificate is used. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.345, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Cancer-related certificate. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must issue a certificate under this section to an applicant who submits: new text end new text begin (1) an application in the form and manner acceptable to the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (2) a medical statement under subdivision 2a that affirms: new text end new text begin (i) the applicant has been diagnosed with cancer; new text end new text begin (ii) due to the diagnosis or an associated condition or treatment, the applicant is experiencing any of the conditions described in subdivision 2, paragraph (f); and new text end new text begin (iii) the circumstances in items (i) and (ii) are expected to apply for at least 30 days. new text end new text begin (b) A certificate issued under this subdivision is valid for up to 12 months. new text end new text begin (c) The operator of a vehicle displaying a certificate has the parking privileges provided in subdivision 1 only while the vehicle is actually parked while transporting a person for whom the certificate is issued. new text end